Utah statutes.
62A-15-105.   Authority and responsibilities of division.
The division shall set policy for its operation and for programs funded with
state and federal moneys under Sections 17-43-201, 17-43-301, 17-43-304, and
62A-15-110.  The division shall:
(1)  in establishing rules, seek input from local substance abuse authorities,
local mental health authorities, consumers, providers, advocates, division
staff, and other interested parties as determined by the division;
(2)  establish, by rule, minimum standards for local substance abuse
authorities and local mental health authorities;
(3)  establish, by rule, procedures for developing policies that ensure that
local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities are
given opportunity to comment and provide input on any new policy of the
division or proposed changes in existing rules of the division;
(4)  provide a mechanism for review of its existing policy, and for
consideration of policy changes that are proposed by local substance abuse
authorities or local mental health authorities;
(5)  develop program policies, standards, rules, and fee schedules for the
division; and
(6)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, make rules approving the form and content of substance abuse treatment,
educational series, screening, and assessment that are described in Section
41-6a-501.
